Maine, session 132, LD2014.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15688-A, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 420, §8, is
amended to read:
F. Equipment provided pursuant to subsection 6; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15688-A, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 420, §8, is
amended to read:
G. Student Until the 2027-2028 school year, student enrollment, which is determined
as follows.
(1) For each program or plan approved pursuant to chapter 313 that has 3 years of
attending student counts on October 1st, student enrollment is a 3-year average of
the attending student counts on October 1st for that program or plan.
(2) For each program or plan approved pursuant to chapter 313 that is not governed
by subparagraph (1), including a new program or plan approved pursuant to chapter
313, student enrollment must be based on the estimated attending student count
submitted in accordance with the application for the program or plan approval.
This estimated attending student count must be used until the program or plan has
3 consecutive years of actual attending student counts on October 1st.; and
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15688-A, sub-§1, ¶G-1 is enacted to read:
G-1. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, student enrollment, which is
determined as follows.
(1) For each program or plan approved pursuant to chapter 313 that has 2 years of
attending student counts on October 1st, student enrollment is a 2-year average of
the attending student counts on October 1st for that program or plan.
(2) For each program or plan approved pursuant to chapter 313 that is not governed
by subparagraph (1), including a new program or plan approved pursuant to chapter
313, student enrollment must be based on the estimated attending student count
submitted in accordance with the application for the program or plan approval.
This estimated attending student count must be used until the program or plan has
2 years of actual attending student counts on October 1st.